District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.03a

Regulations for personal mobility devices.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate regulations governing the PMD, including:

(1)

Exempting the personal mobility device from the regulations governing motor vehicles;

(2)

Establishing a registration process, such as, for example, requiring that each PMD bear a serial number, valid registration tag, or valid registration plate;

(3)

Establishing a fine schedule for violations of the PMD regulations; and

(4)

Providing an adjudication process for violations of PMD law and regulations.

(b)

Regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the proposed rules are not approved within the 45-day period of review, the rules shall be deemed disapproved.

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 6a
as added Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-235, § 10(b), 49 DCR 9788
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-224, § 101(b), 53 DCR 10225
D.C. Law 16-224 revived the provisions of D.C. Law 14-235 that expired on October 1, 2005.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 10(b) of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-85, April 4, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 3344).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(b) of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-237, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 249).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(b) of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-323, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2567).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101(b) of Personal Mobility Device Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-528, December 4, 2006, 53 DCR 9826).
Expiration of previous addition: Section 14 of D.C. Law 14-235 ( 49 DCR 9788), which previously added this section, expired on October 1, 2005.